Florida, session 2026, HB43.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of section
790.065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
790.065 Sale and delivery of firearms.—
(4)(a) Any records containing any of the information set
forth in subsection (1) pertaining to a buyer or transferee who
is not found to be prohibited from receipt or transfer of a
firearm or ammunition by reason of Florida and federal law which
records are created by the Department of Law Enforcement to
conduct the criminal history record check shall be confidential
and exempt from the provisions of s. 119.07(1) and may not be
disclosed by the Department of Law Enforcement or any officer or
employee thereof to any person or to another agency. The
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb43-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 43 2026
Department of Law Enforcement shall destroy any such records
forthwith after it communicates the approval and nonapproval
numbers to the licensee and, in any event, such records shall be
destroyed within 48 hours after the day of the response to the
licensee's request.
Section 2. The amendments to s. 790.065(4)(a), Florida
Statutes, made by this act are subject to the Open Government
Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15, Florida
Statutes, and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, and the
text of this paragraph shall revert to that in existence on
September 30, 2026, except that any amendments to such text
enacted other than by this act shall be preserved and continue
to operate to the extent that such amendments are not dependent
upon the portions of text which expire pursuant to this section,
unless reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
Legislature.
Section 3. The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that the information pertaining to a person who is a
buyer or transferee who is not found to be prohibited from
receipt or transfer of ammunition under s. 790.065, Florida
Statutes, be made confidential and exempt from public records
requirements under s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a),
Article I of the State Constitution. The knowledge that a person
has purchased ammunition can easily lead to the conclusion that
the applicant or licensee has in fact armed himself or herself.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb43-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 43 2026
The Legislature has found in prior legislative sessions and has
expressed in s. 790.335(1)(a)3., Florida Statutes, that a list,
record, or registry of legally owned firearms or law-abiding
firearm owners is "an instrument that can be used as a means to
profile innocent citizens and to harass and abuse American
citizens based solely on their choice to own firearms and
exercise their Second Amendment right to keep and bear arms as
guaranteed under the United States Constitution." Release of
personal identifying information of a person who has purchased
ammunition could be used to harass an innocent person based
solely on that person's exercised right to own a firearm.
Therefore, the Legislature finds that such information must be
held confidential and exempt from public records requirements.
Section 4. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 41 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb43-00